California, session 20252026, AB1617.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25218.9 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:25218.9. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, including subdivision (c) of Section 18751.2.2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, the Form 303 Household Hazardous Waste Collection Report required to be submitted by each public agency that is responsible for household hazardous waste management pursuant to Section 18751.2.2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations shall be submitted annually to the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery on or before October 1 and report information for the prior calendar year.(b) On or before October 1 of each year, a public agency, or its contractor, operating a household hazardous waste collection facility shall submit to the CUPA, or, in jurisdictions where there is no CUPA, to the officer or agency authorized pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 25404.3 to implement and enforce the requirements of this chapter listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 25404, a copy of the completed Form 303 Household Hazardous Waste Collection Report, which is required to be submitted to the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery pursuant to regulations adopted by that department. The Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery shall provide a copy of the completed Form 303 Household Hazardous Waste Collection Report shall also be submitted to the Department of Toxic Substances Control until (1) regulations promulgated by the Secretary for Environmental Protection establishing a unified program information collection and reporting system and standards are effective, (2) the regulations require a statewide database system that will enable the department and the public to obtain the required information from all CUPAs or the authorized officers or agencies, and (3) the statewide database system is in place and fully operational. upon request.